Nebraska, session 109, LB731.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 6 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Gender Transition Malpractice Accountability Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that:
(1) Individuals subjected to gender transition procedures,
especially as minors, may not recognize the full extent of physical,
psychological, or reproductive harm until well into adulthood;
(2) Standard medical malpractice statutes of limitations often
expire before such individuals can reasonably discover injury or
causation; and
(3) Extending the statute of limitations and creating a private
right of action for such individuals protects patients, promotes
accountability, and upholds the integrity of medical practice.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Gender Transition Malpractice
Accountability Act:
(1) Cross-sex hormones means testosterone or other androgens given
to biological females in amounts that are larger or more potent than
would normally occur naturally in healthy females and estrogen given to
males in amounts that are larger or more potent than would normally occur
naturally in healthy males;
(2) Female has the same meaning as in section 79-3803;
(3) Gender means the psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural
aspects of being male or female;
(4) Gender alteration means the process in which a person goes from
identifying with and living as a gender that corresponds to his or her
sex to identifying with and living as a gender different from his or her
sex, such as a member of the opposite sex or as nonbinary, and may
involve social, legal, or physical changes;
(5)(a) Gender-altering procedures includes any medical or surgical
service, including without limitation physician's services, inpatient and
outpatient hospital services, or prescribed drugs related to gender
alteration, that seeks to:
-2-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
(i) Alter or remove physical or anatomical characteristics or
features that are typical for the individual's sex; or
(ii) Instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics
that resemble a sex different from the individual's sex, including
without limitation medical services that provide puberty-blocking drugs,
cross-sex hormones, or other mechanisms to promote the development of
feminizing or masculinizing features in the opposite sex, or genital or
nongenital gender-altering surgery performed for the purpose of assisting
an individual with a gender alteration.
(b) Gender-altering procedures does not include:
(i) Services to persons born with a medically verifiable disorder of
sex development, including a person with external sex characteristics
that are irresolvably ambiguous, such as those born with 46 XX
chromosomes with virilization, 46 XY chromosomes with undervirilization,
or both ovarian and testicular tissue;
(ii) Services provided when a physician has otherwise diagnosed a
disorder of sexual development that the physician has determined, through
genetic or biochemical testing, that the person does not have normal sex-
chromosome structure, sex-steroid production, or sex-steroid hormone
action;
(iii) The acute and chronic treatment of any infection, injury,
disease, or disorder that has been caused by or exacerbated by the
performance of a gender-altering procedure, whether or not the gender-
altering procedure was performed in accordance with state and federal
law; or
(iv) Any procedure undertaken because the individual suffers from a
physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness that would, as
certified by the physician, place the individual in imminent danger of
death or impairment of major bodily function unless surgery is performed;
(6) Gender-altering surgery means any medical or surgical service
that seeks to surgically alter or remove healthy physical or anatomical
-3-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
characteristics or features that are typical for the individual's sex in
order to instill or create physiological or anatomical characteristics
that resemble a sex different from the individual's sex, including
without limitation, genital or nongenital gender-altering surgery
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration;
(7) Genital gender-altering surgery means a medical procedure
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration, including without limitation:
(a) Surgical procedures such as penectomy, orchiectomy,
vaginoplasty, clitoroplasty, or vulvoplasty for male patients or
hysterectomy or ovariectomy for female patients;
(b) Reconstruction of the fixed part of the urethra with or without
a metoidioplasty; or
(c) Phalloplasty, vaginectomy, scrotoplasty, or implantation of
erection or testicular prostheses for female patients;
(8) Male has the same meaning as in section 79-3803;
(9) Nongenital gender-altering surgery means medical procedures
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration, including without limitation:
(a) Surgical procedures for male patients, such as voice surgery or
thyroid cartilage reduction; or
(b) Surgical procedures for female patients, such as subcutaneous
mastectomy or voice surgery;
(10) Provider means any physician, mental health professional,
clinic, hospital, or other entity involved in recommending, approving, or
providing a gender-altering procedure;
(11) Puberty-blocking drugs means gonadotropin-releasing hormone
analogues or other synthetic drugs used in biological males to stop
luteinizing hormone secretion and therefore testosterone secretion, or
synthetic drugs used in females which stop the production of estrogens
-4-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
and progesterone, when used to delay or suppress pubertal development in
children for the purpose of assisting an individual with a gender
alteration; and
(12) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female, without
reference to the individual's psychological state, behavior, expression,
or personal identity.
Sec. 4. (1) An action for injury or damages arising out of the
recommendation, approval, or provision of a gender-altering procedure can
only be brought against a provider within twelve years after the later of
the date of such provider's recommendation, approval, or procedure.
(2) Sovereign immunity is waived for any claim brought for injury or
damages arising out of the recommendation, approval, or provision of a
gender-altering procedure.
(3) A provider shall not seek a contractual waiver of the liability
arising out of the performance of or failure to perform services while in
the course of facilitating or perpetuating a gender-altering procedure.
Any attempted waiver is contrary to the public policy of this state and
is null and void.
Sec. 5. Any person entitled to bring an action under the Gender
Transition Malpractice Accountability Act may recover actual damages and
reasonable attorney's fees. Actual damages shall include, without
limitation, damages for physical injury, pain and suffering, emotional
distress, loss of fertility, diminished capacity for sexual relations,
loss of income, and other economic and noneconomic losses.
Sec. 6. (1) A provider who performs or prescribes any gender-
altering procedure shall, prior to initiating the procedure, provide the
patient, and the patient's parent or legal guardian if the patient is
younger than nineteen years of age, with a written disclosure of:
(a) All known physical and psychological risks associated with the
gender-altering procedure;
(b) If applicable, the lack of conclusive long-term data on safety
-5-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
and efficacy of the gender-altering procedure; and
(c) The potential for regret and need for future medical
interventions.
(2) Such disclosure shall be signed by the provider, the patient,
and, as appropriate, at least one parent or legal guardian. The provider
shall maintain a copy of such disclosure in the medical record for such
patient.
(3) Nothing in this section shall authorize a provider to perform or
prescribe any gender-altering procedure on a patient who is younger than
nineteen years of age in violation of any state law, the Let Them Grow
Act, or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the Let
Them Grow Act.
Sec. 7. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Cross-sex hormones has the same meaning as in section 3 of this
act;
(b) Female has the same meaning as in section 79-3803;
(c) Gender has the same meaning as in section 3 of this act;
(d) Gender alteration has the same meaning as in section 3 of this
act;
(e) Gender-altering procedure has the same meaning as in section 3
of this act;
(f) Gender-altering surgery has the same meaning as in section 3 of
this act;
(g) Genital gender-altering surgery has the same meaning as in
section 3 of this act;
(h) Health insurance policy means (i) any individual or group
sickness and accident insurance policy or subscriber contract delivered,
issued for delivery, or renewed in this state and any hospital, medical,
or surgical expense-incurred policy, except for policies that provide
coverage for a specific disease or other limited-benefit coverage, and
(ii) any self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
-6-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
federal law;
(i) Male has the same meaning as in section 79-3803;
(j) Nongenital gender-altering surgery has the same meaning as in
section 3 of this act;
(k) Puberty-blocking drugs has the same meaning as in section 3 of
this act; and
(l) Sex means an individual's sex, either male or female without
reference to the individual's psychological state, behavior, expression,
or personal identity.
(2) This section applies beginning January 1, 2027.
(3) Notwithstanding section 44-3,131, any health insurance policy
which provides coverage or has ever provided coverage for a covered
individual's gender-altering procedure shall:
(a) Provide coverage, including for any applicable diagnostic or
billing code, for:
(i) All possible adverse consequences related to the covered
individual's gender-altering procedure, including any short-term or long-
term side effects of the procedure;
(ii) Any baseline and follow-up testing or screening necessary to
monitor the mental and physical health of the covered individual on at
least an annual basis without regard to the sex or gender identity
designation in the covered individual's medical record; and
(iii) Any procedure, treatment, or therapy necessary to manage,
reverse, reconstruct from, or recover from the covered individual's
gender-altering procedure; and
(b) Provide the coverage described in this subsection to any covered
individual who has undergone a gender-altering procedure regardless of
whether the covered individual was enrolled in the plan or policy at the
time of the procedure.
Sec. 8. Section 25-222, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-7-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
25-222 Any action to recover damages based on alleged professional
negligence or upon alleged breach of warranty in rendering or failure to
render professional services shall be commenced within two years next
after the alleged act or omission in rendering or failure to render
professional services providing the basis for such action; Provided, if
the cause of action is not discovered and could not be reasonably
discovered within such two-year period, then the action may be commenced
within one year from the date of such discovery or from the date of
discovery of facts which would reasonably lead to such discovery,
whichever is earlier; and provided further, that in no event may any
action be commenced to recover damages for professional negligence or
breach of warranty in rendering or failure to render professional
services more than ten years after the date of rendering or failure to
render such professional service which provides the basis for the cause
of action.
This section does not apply to claims brought pursuant to the Gender
Transition Malpractice Accountability Act.
Sec. 9. Section 71-7307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-7307 An individual that received a gender-altering procedure in
violation of section 71-7304 after October 1, 2023, and while such
individual was younger than nineteen years of age, or the parent or
guardian of such an individual, may bring a civil action for appropriate
relief against the health care practitioner who performed the gender-
altering procedure. Appropriate relief in an action under this section
includes actual damages and reasonable attorney's fees. An action under
this section shall be brought within the time an action must be brought
pursuant to section 4 of this act two years after discovery of damages.
Sec. 10. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 11. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
-8-

LB731 LB731
2026 2026
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 12. Original section 25-222, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 71-7307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-9-